tr: Şarap Tatlılığı: Sek; Orta; Orta sek; Yarı sek; Yarı tatlı; Tatlı; Diğer
pl: Słodkość wina: Sucha; Środek; Średnio suchy; Po wyschnięciu; Półsłodki; Słodki; Inne
th: ความหวานของไวน์: ไม่หวาน; สื่อ; หวานเล็กน้อย; หวานปลายลิ้น; ค่อนข้างหวาน; หวานมาก; อื่นๆ
vi: Vị ngọt của rượu vang: Không ngọt; Vừa; Hơi ngọt; Ít ngọt; Bán ngọt; Ngọt; Khác
da: Vinsødme: Tør; Medium; Medium tør; Ekstra tør; Halvsød; Sød; Andet
ro-RO: Dulceața vinului: Sec; Mediu; Mediu sec; Demi-sec; Demi-dulce; Dulce; Altele
fr: Douceur du vin: Sec; Moyen; Demi-sec; Demi-sec; Mi-doux; Doux; Autre
lt-LT: Vyno saldumas: Sausas; Vidutinis; Pusiau sausas; „Off-dry“ (pusiau sausas); Pusiau saldus; Saldus; Kita
ja: ワインの甘さ: ドライ; 媒体; ミディアムドライ; オフドライ; セミスウィート; スウィート; その他
nb: Vinsødme: Tørr; Middels; Middels tørr; Halvtørr; Sødmefull; Søt; Annet
cs: Vína podle obsahu zbytkového cukru: Suché; Médium; Středně suché; Polosuché; Polosladké; Sladké; Jiné
fi: Viinin makeus: Kuiva; Keskimääräinen; Keskikuiva; Vähän makea; Puolimakea; Makea; Muu
ru: Сладость вина: Сухое; Среднее; Полусухое; Полусухое; Полусладкое; Сладкое; Другое
hu: Bor édessége: Száraz; Közepes; Közepesen száraz; Félszáraz; Félédes; Édes; Egyéb
sv: Vinsötma: Torrt; Medium; Medeltorr; Off-dry; Halvsött; Sött; Övrigt
de: Weinsüße: Trocken; Medium; Halbtrocken; Feinherb; Lieblich; Süß; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Сладост на вино: Сухо; Средно; Средно сухо; Полусухо; Полусладко; Сладко; Други
sl-SI: Sladkost vina: Suho; Srednja; Srednje suho; Nesuho; Polsladko; Sladko; Drugo
en: Wine sweetness: Dry; Medium; Medium dry; Off-dry; Semi-sweet; Sweet; Other
pt-PT: Doçura do vinho: Seco; Médio; Meio seco; Ressecado; Meio doce; Doce; Outro
sk-SK: Sladkosť vína: Suchý; Stredný; Stredne suchý; Vysušený; Polosladký; Sladký; Iné
hr-HR: Slatkoća vina: Suho; Polusuho; Polusuho; Nije suho; Poluslatko; Slatko; Ostalo
nl: Zoetheid wijn: Droog; Medium; Halfdroog; Half-droog; Halfzoet; Zoet; Andere
es: Dulzura del vino: Seco; Medio; Semiseco; Semiseco; Semidulce; Dulce; Otros
zh-TW: 葡萄酒甜度: 乾式; 媒介; 半乾; 半乾; 半甜; 甜; 其他
it: Dolcezza del vino: Secco; Medio; Mediamente secco; Amabile; Semi-dolce; Dolce; Altro
zh-CN: 葡萄酒甜度: 干; 媒介; 半干; 微甜; 半甜; 甜型; 其他
el: Γλυκύτητα κρασιού: Ξηρό κούρδισμα; Μέση; Μέτριο ξηρό; Στεγνό; Ημίγλυκο; Γλυκιά; Άλλο
pt-BR: Doçura do vinho: Seco; Médio; Meio-seco; Semissuave; Meio-doce; Doce; Outro
ko: 와인 당도: 드라이; 매체; 미디엄 드라이; 오프드라이; 세미스위트; 스위트; 기타